Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of prohibiting child pornography and any other
form of federally defined racketeering in this state and establishing that any person who
produces, possesses, distributes, or aids and abets in producing, possessing, or
distributing child pornography, or engages in, aids, abets, or otherwise assists in federally
defined racketeering activity shall be guilty of a felony of the second highest degree,
unless someone dies as a result of the activity in which case the person shall be guilty of
murder, by amending the Constitution of Kentucky as stated below?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Neither child pornography, nor any other form of racketeering as defined
by federal law on February 1, 2025, shall occur in the Commonwealth.
(2) Any person who produces, possesses, distributes, or aids and abets the
production, possession, or distribution of child pornography, or otherwise engages in
the commission of any federally defined racketeering activity, shall be guilty of a felony
in the second highest degree under the laws of this Commonwealth, unless a human
dies in the commission of or as a result of child pornography or any other federally
defined racketeering activity, in which case any person who engages in, aids, abets, or
otherwise assists in the commission of any federally defined racketeering activity shall
be guilty of murder as defined in the laws of the Commonwealth.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 8:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1430
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 8:30 AM Jacketed